Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
General Provisions
§ 71-3-55.
Procedure before the commission.

In making an investigation or inquiry or conducting a hearing, the commission shall not be bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules or procedure, except as provided by this chapter, but may make such investigation or inquiry or conduct such hearing in such manner as best to ascertain the rights of the parties. Declarations of a deceased employee concerning the injury in respect of which the investigation or inquiry is being made or the hearing conducted shall be received in evidence and shall, if corroborated by other evidence, be sufficient to establish the injury.

Hearings before the commission shall be open to the public and shall be stenographically reported or recorded and transcribed. The commission shall by regulations provide for the preparation of a record of the hearings and other proceedings.

Unless otherwise ordered by the commission, hearings shall be conducted in the county where the injury occurred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-28; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 22; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 28; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-57.
Witnesses and their fees.

The commission shall regulate, by rules published and available to the parties, the summoning, attendance, use, and compensation of witnesses, and determine the qualifications of specialists and their scale of fees as expert witnesses. Unless otherwise provided by the commission, witnesses summoned in a proceeding before the commission or whose depositions are taken shall receive the same fees and mileage as witnesses in civil cases in courts of record.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-29; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 23; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-59.
Costs in proceedings brought without reasonable ground; penalties for pursuit of frivolous claim.

If the court having jurisdiction of proceedings in respect of any claim or compensation order determined that the proceedings in respect of such claim or order have been instituted or continued without reasonable ground, the costs of such proceedings shall be assessed against the party who has so instituted or continued such proceedings.

If the full commission determines that proceedings in respect to a claim have been instituted, continued or delayed, including by way of appeal to the commission, without reasonable ground, the full commission shall require the party who has so instituted, continued or delayed such proceedings or the attorney advising such party, or both, to pay the reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, caused by such institution, continuance or delay to the opposing party. In addition to requiring the payment of reasonable expenses, including attorney’s fees, to the opposing party, the commission may levy a civil penalty not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) against such party, or attorney advising or assisting such party, or both, payable to the commission. Any such civil penalty levied and collected by the commission shall be deposited into the Administrative Expense Fund provided for in Section 71-3-97 and any such penalty which is not voluntarily paid may be collected by civil suit brought by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-30; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 24; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 30; Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 31; Laws, 1993, ch. 552, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1993).

§ 71-3-61.
Procedural authority of the commission.

The commission and its hearing officers shall have power to preserve and enforce order during hearings; to issue subpoenas for, to administer oaths to, and to compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses or the production of books, papers, documents, and other evidence, or the taking of depositions before any designated individual competent to administer oaths; to examine witnesses; and to do all things conformable to law which may be necessary to enable them effectively to discharge the duties of their office.

If any person in proceedings before the commission disobeys or resists any lawful order or process, or misbehaves during a hearing or so near the place thereof as to obstruct the same, or neglects to produce, after having been ordered to do so, any pertinent book, paper, or document, or refuses to appear after having been subpoenaed or upon appearing refuses to take the oath as a witness, or after having taken the oath refuses to be examined according to law, the commission shall certify the facts to the court having jurisdiction in the place in which it is sitting, and the court shall thereupon in a summary manner hear the evidence as to the acts complained of and, if the evidence so warrants, punish such person in the same manner and to the same extent as for a contempt committed before the court, or commit such person upon the same condition as if the doing of the forbidden act had occurred with reference to the process of or in the presence of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-31; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 25; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 31; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 32, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-63.
Fees for legal and other services.

No claim for legal services or for any other services rendered in respect of a claim or award for compensation, to or on account of any person, shall be valid unless approved by the commission or, if proceedings for review of the order of the commission in respect of such claim or award are had before any court, unless approved by such court. Any claim so approved shall, in the manner and to the extent fixed by the commission or such court, be a lien upon such compensation.

Any person (a) who receives any fee, other consideration, or any gratuity on account of services so rendered, unless such consideration or gratuity is approved by the commission or such court, or (b) who makes it a business to solicit employment for a lawyer or for himself in respect of any claim or award for compensation, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall for each offense be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment not to exceed one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Representation of one other than himself or herself before the commission shall be considered the practice of law, and all statutes applying to and regulating the practice in all other courts of law in this state shall likewise apply to practice before the commission, insofar as the qualifications of those practicing before the commission are concerned. This paragraph shall not be construed as tightening the rules of evidence which are otherwise relaxed in other sections of this chapter.

In no instance shall the amount recovered by an attorney for an appearance before the commission exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total award of compensation. Such limitations, however, shall not be construed as applying to a fee awarded for additional services by any superior court. Legal services rendered where no motion to controvert has been filed by either employer or employee shall be considered as consultation, and that factor shall be taken into consideration in awarding a fee. Attorneys may not recover attorney’s fees based upon benefits voluntarily paid to an injured employee for temporary or permanent disability. Any settlement negotiated by an attorney shall not be considered a voluntary payment. In all instances, fees shall be awarded on the basis of fairness to both attorney and client. Although exceptions may be made in the interest of justice, it shall be deemed conducive to the best interest of all concerned for the commission to approve contracts for attorney’s fees voluntarily entered into between attorney and client, within the limitations hereinabove set out.

When an award of compensation becomes final and an attorney’s fee is outstanding, a partial lump-sum settlement sufficient to cover the attorney’s fee approved therein by the commission shall be made immediately, from payments last to become due, and the deductions allowed by the law shall be borne equally by the attorney and the client.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-32; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 26; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 12; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 33; Laws, 2012, ch. 522, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 71-3-65.
Record of injury or death.

Every employer shall keep a record in respect of any injury to an employee. Such record shall contain such information of disability or death in respect of such injury as the commission may by regulation require, and shall be available to inspection by the commission or by any state authority at such times and under such conditions as the commission may by regulation prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-33; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 27; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 33; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-66.
Confidentiality of records.

The noncontroverted case medical reports, rehabilitation counselor reports and psychological reports of the commission, insofar as they refer to accidents, injuries and settlements, shall not be open to the public under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983, but only to the parties satisfying the commission of their interest in such records and the right to inspect them. Under such reasonable rules and regulations as the commission may adopt, the records of the commission as to any employee in any previous case in which such employee was a claimant shall be open to and made available to such claim to an employer or its insurance carrier which is called upon to pay compensation, medical expenses and/or funeral expenses, or to any party at interest, except that the commission may make such reasonable charge as it deems proper for furnishing information by mail and for copies of records.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1984, ch. 369; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 35, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-67.
Reports of injuries.

Within ten (10) days after the fatal termination of any injury, the employer, if self-insured, or its carrier, shall file a report thereof with the commission on a form approved by the commission for this purpose.

In the event of an injury which shall cause loss of time in excess of the waiting period prescribed in Section 71-3-11, a report thereof shall be filed with the commission by the employer or carrier, on a form approved by the commission for this purpose, within ten (10) days after the prescribed waiting period has been satisfied.

Within ten (10) days after the employer or carrier knows, or reasonably should know, that an injury has resulted, or likely will result, in permanent disability or serious head or facial disfigurement, but which does not cause a loss of time in excess of the prescribed waiting period, a report thereof shall be filed with the commission on a form approved by the commission for this purpose.

Injuries not otherwise provided for in this section, and for which only medical benefits are due, are not required to be reported to the commission. Records of such injuries shall be maintained by the employer, if self-insured, or its carrier, and shall contain the name and address of the employee, the date of the accident, the name and address of the employer, the nature of the injury, the number of days lost and the total medical expense. These records shall be made available to the commission upon request.

If an injury provided for in this subsection subsequently causes a loss of time in excess of the prescribed waiting period, or causes permanent disability or serious head or facial disfigurement, it shall be reported within ten (10) days thereafter on the form approved for such claims.

Any additional reports shall be sent to the commission in such time and in such manner as the commission may prescribe.

Filing may be by mail, electronic means or other form of delivery reasonably calculated to accomplish receipt by the commission. Any such report required to be filed hereunder shall be considered filed on the date of mailing, if filing is by mail, and on the date the electronic equipment being used acknowledges receipt of the material, if filing is by electronic means. Otherwise, the date of filing shall be the date of receipt by the commission.

Whenever an employer or carrier fails or refuses to file any report required by this section within the time prescribed, the commission may, in its discretion, and after giving the employer or carrier notice and an opportunity to show cause to the contrary, levy a penalty against such employer or carrier not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00). This penalty shall be payable to the Administrative Expense Fund provided for by this chapter, and if not voluntarily paid, may be collected by civil suit brought by the commission.

In addition to the above civil penalty, a sum not to exceed One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) may, in the discretion of an administrative judge or the commission, be added to any award which may be made as a result of any injury not timely reported hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-34; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 28; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 34; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 36; Laws, 1995, ch. 582, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 71-3-69.
Penalty for misrepresentation.

Any person who willfully makes any false or misleading statement or representation for the purpose of obtaining or wrongfully withholding any benefit or payment under this chapter is guilty of a felony and on conviction thereof may be punished by a fine of not to exceed Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or double the value of the fraud, whichever is greater, or by imprisonment not to exceed three (3) years, or by both fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-35; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 29; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 37; Laws, 1995, ch. 598, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§ 71-3-71.
Compensation for injuries where third parties are liable.

The acceptance of compensation benefits from or the making of a claim for compensation against an employer or insurer for the injury or death of an employee shall not affect the right of the employee or his dependents to sue any other party at law for such injury or death, but the employer or his insurer shall be entitled to reasonable notice and opportunity to join in any such action or may intervene therein. If such employer or insurer join in such action, they shall be entitled to repayment of the amount paid by them as compensation and medical expenses from the net proceeds of such action (after deducting the reasonable costs of collection) as hereinafter provided.

The commencement of an action by an employee or his dependents (or legal representative) against a third party for damages by reason of the injury, or the adjustment of any such claim, shall not affect the right of the injured employee or his dependents (or legal representative) to recover compensation, but any amount recovered by the injured employee or his dependents (or legal representative) from a third party shall be applied as follows: reasonable costs of collection as approved and allowed by the court in which such action is pending, or by the commission of this state in case of settlement without suit, shall be deducted; the remainder, or so much thereof as is necessary, shall be used to discharge the legal liability of the employer or insurer; and any excess shall belong to the injured employee or his dependents. The employee or his dependents bringing suit against the third party must notify the employer or carrier within fifteen (15) days of the filing of such suit.

An employer or compensation insurer who shall have paid compensation benefits under this chapter for the injury or death of the employee shall have the right to maintain an action at law against any other party responsible for such injury or death, in the name of such injured employee or his beneficiaries, or in the name of such employer or insurer, or any or all of them. If reasonable notice and opportunity to be represented in such action by counsel shall have been given to the compensation beneficiary, all claims of such compensation beneficiary shall be determined in such action, as well as the claim of the employer or insurer. If recovery shall be had against such other party, by suit or otherwise, the compensation beneficiary shall be entitled to any amount recovered over and above the amount that the employer and insurer shall have paid or are liable for in compensation or other benefits, after deducting the reasonable costs of collection.

In case of settlement of any action before the trial thereof, such settlement shall be subject to the approval of the court wherein such action is pending, and settlement before an action is brought shall be subject to the approval of the commission. Distribution of the portion belonging to the dependents shall be made among such dependents in the manner provided in this chapter.

In case of liability of the employer or insurer to make payment to the state treasury under the second injury fund provisions, if the injury or death creates a legal liability against a third party, the employer or insurer shall have a right of action against such third party for reimbursement of any sum so paid into the state treasury, which right may be enforced in the action heretofore provided or by an independent action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-36; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 30; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 38, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-73.
Second Injury Trust Fund.

If an employee who has previously lost, or lost the use of, one (1) hand, one (1) arm, one (1) foot, one (1) leg, or one (1) eye, becomes permanently and totally incapacitated through the loss, or loss of use, of another member or organ, the employer shall be liable only for the compensation payable for such second injury. In addition to such compensation and after the completion of the payment therefor, the employee shall be paid the remainder of the compensation that would be due for permanent total incapacity, out of a special fund known as the “Second Injury Trust Fund,” and created for such purpose in the following manner:

In every case of compensable death of an employee under this chapter, the employer or, if insured, his insurance carrier shall pay to the commission the sum of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) except in cases where there is no dependency, then there shall be paid to the commission the sum of Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) to be deposited with the State Treasurer for the benefit of said fund. A suspension of said payments of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per death shall be made when the total amount of all such payments, together with the accumulated interest thereon, equals or exceeds Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00), and no further contributions to said fund shall be made except in cases where there is no dependency. Whenever, thereafter, the amount of such sum shall be reduced below One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) by reason of payments made pursuant to this section, then such contributions of Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per death shall be resumed forthwith and shall continue until such sum, together with accumulated interest thereon, shall again amount to Three Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($350,000.00); and the commission shall direct the distribution thereof.

During fiscal year 2017 and thereafter, the Workers’ Compensation Commission shall have full authority to assess employers or insurers the amounts provided in this section for deposit into the Second Injury Trust Fund, however, such funds shall not be used for the support of the agency.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-37; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 31; Laws, 1956, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 278; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 37; Laws, 1983, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 361, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 39; Laws 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 27, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).

§ 71-3-75.
Security for payment of compensation.

Insurance of liability:— An employer liable under this chapter to pay compensation shall insure payment of such compensation by a carrier authorized to insure such liability in this state unless such employer shall be exempted from doing so by the commission.

Exemption from insuring:— An employer desiring to be exempt from insuring its liability for compensation shall make application to the commission, showing its financial ability to pay such compensation and agreeing as a condition for the granting of the exemption to faithfully report all injuries under compensation according to law and the requirement of the commission, and to comply with the provisions of this chapter and the rules of the commission pertaining to the administration thereof; whereupon the commission by written order may make such exemption. The commission may from time to time require further statement of financial ability of such employer to pay compensation and may, upon ten (10) days’ notice in writing, for financial reasons or for failure of the employer to faithfully discharge its obligations according to the agreements contained in its application for exemption, revoke the order granting such exemption, in which case such employer shall immediately insure its liability as otherwise required under this chapter. As a condition for the granting of an exemption, the commission shall have authority to require the employer to furnish such security as the commission may consider sufficient to insure payment of all claims of such employer under compensation. State agencies qualified as self-insured status shall not be required to furnish any security to insure or guarantee payment of claims or expenses and shall not be required to establish and maintain reserves for claims incurred but not reported and expenses associated therewith, as a condition for the granting or continuation of an exemption as herein provided. Where the security is in the form of a bond or other personal guaranty, the commission may, at any time either before or after the entry of an award upon at least ten (10) days’ notice and opportunity to be heard, require the sureties to pay the amount of the award, the same to be enforced in like manner as the award itself may be enforced. Where an employer procures an exemption as herein provided and thereafter enters into any form of agreement for insurance coverage with an insurance company or interinsurer not licensed to operate in this state, its conduct shall automatically operate as a revocation of such exemption. An order exempting an employer from insuring its liability for compensation shall be null and void if the application contains a financial statement which is false in any material respect. The commission shall revoke the self-insurance permit if the employer is found to have directly or indirectly induced an employee to forego his right to workers’ compensation benefits.

Pooling of liabilities:— The commission may, under such rules and regulations as it prescribes, permit two (2) or more employers engaged in a common type of business activity or pursuit, or having other reasons to associate, to enter into agreements to pool their liabilities under this section for the purpose of qualifying as group self-insurers, and, in conjunction therewith, to enter into agreements to pool any other liabilities to their employees, and each employer member of such approved group shall be classified as a self-insurer. A self-insured group under this section shall be comprised of employer members of the same bona fide trade association or trade group. Such trade association or trade group shall be domiciled in the State of Mississippi, shall have been in existence for five (5) or more consecutive years as of the date of application for an approved group and shall not be comprised solely of employer members who are affiliates of a person possessing controlling interest in such affiliates.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-38; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 32; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 38; Laws, 1988, ch. 560; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 40; Laws, 2004, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 526, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006.).

§ 71-3-77.
Insurance policy regulations.

Every contract for the insurance of the compensation herein provided, or against liability therefor, shall be deemed to be made subject to the provisions of this chapter, and provisions thereof inconsistent with this chapter shall be void. Such contract shall be allowed to offer deductibles on all liability of the assured under and according to the provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding any agreement of the parties to the contrary. However, the payments of the claims, including the deductible amounts, shall be made directly from the insurance company to the employee, except for medical benefits which shall be paid to the medical provider. A copy of such payments shall be forwarded to the employer. The insurance company shall collect the deductible from the employer as shall be provided in the contract between the employer and the insurer. No such policy shall be subject to nonrenewal, or cancelled by the insurer within the policy period, until a notice in writing shall be given to the commission and to the insured, fixing the date on which it is proposed to cancel it or declaring that the company does not intend to renew the policy upon expiration date. Notice to the insured shall be served personally or by registered or certified mail. Notice to the commission shall be provided in such manner and on such form as the commission may prescribe or direct. No such cancellation or nonrenewal shall be effective until thirty (30) days after the service of such notice on the insured and the provision of notice to the commission, unless the employer has obtained other insurance coverage, in which case such policy shall be deemed cancelled as of the effective date of such other insurance, whether or not such notice has been given. The notice requirements of this section shall not apply when a replacement policy form providing the same or substantially similar coverage is issued by the same insurer, or when transfer of an insured to a licensed affiliate providing the same or substantially similar coverage occurs. Whenever a replacement policy form providing the same or substantially similar coverage is issued by the same insurer, or when a transfer of an insured to a licensed affiliate of the insurer providing the same or substantially similar coverage occurs, documents signed by the insured are applicable to the replacement policy and to coverage being transferred, and remain valid and enforceable.

The insured may also cancel such a policy on the day that the insured either (a) returns the policy to the agent, or (b) signs and delivers to the agent a “lost policy release.” If the insured desires to cancel a policy before the policy has become effective, he may cancel the policy by written notice of cancellation to the agent or company without return of the policy or a release.

Whenever a replacement policy form providing the same or substantially similar coverage is issued by the same insurer, or by a licensed affiliate insurer, such insurer shall mail or deliver to the policyholder, at least thirty (30) days in advance of the effective date of renewal, written notice of any terms or conditions that are less favorable to the policyholder.

A transferring insurer shall notify the Mississippi Insurance Department and the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Commission at least forty-five (45) days in advance of notifying a policyholder that its personal or commercial lines insurance policies will be transferred to another licensed insurer within the same insurance group or same holding company. The notice shall include the name of insurer transferring the personal or commercial lines policies and the name and financial rating of the insurer receiving the transferred personal or commercial lines policies.

A transferring insurer shall provide the policyholder written notice of the policy transfer at least thirty (30) days prior to expiration of the policy term and shall include the financial rating of the insurer receiving the transferred policy. Such notice must be provided to the policyholder with the notice of renewal premium at least thirty (30) days before the effective date of the transfer.

In any case where the employer is not a self-insurer, in order that the liability for compensation imposed by this chapter may be most effectively discharged by the employer and in order that the administration of this chapter in respect of such liability may be facilitated, the commission shall by regulation provide for the discharge, by the carrier or carriers for such employer, of such obligations and duties of the employer in respect of such liability imposed by this chapter upon the employer as it considers proper in order to effectuate the provisions of this chapter. For such purpose (a) notice to or knowledge of an employer of the occurrence of the injury shall be notice to or knowledge of the carrier or carriers; (b) jurisdiction of the employer by the commission or any court under this chapter shall be jurisdiction of the carrier or carriers; and (c) any requirement by the commission or any court under any compensation order, finding, or decision shall be binding upon the carrier or carriers in the same manner and to the same extent as upon the employer.

As used in this section:

“Affiliate transfer” is when an insurer transfers, at renewal or policy expiration, its personal or commercial lines insurance policies to an affiliated licensed insurer that is a member of the same insurance group or same holding company as the transferring insurer. The issuance of a replacement policy form providing the same or substantially similar coverage issued by the same insurer, or the transfer of personal or commercial insurance policies to a licensed affiliate insurer that will issue the same or substantially similar policy, are considered a renewal and will not be treated as a cancellation or nonrenewal. The affiliate transfer must be to a licensed affiliate insurer that has been determined by the commissioner to have the same or better financial strength as the transferring insurer. The policy transfer must be selected on a nondiscriminatory basis.

“Substantially similar” means a policy that provides the same basic coverages but may add, alter or eliminate incidental coverages and may provide coverages using different textual language.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-39; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 33; Laws, 1972, ch. 396, § 1; reenacted, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 39; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 41; Laws, 1992, ch. 577, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007; Laws, 2018, ch. 312, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 71-3-79.
Acceptance of premium by carrier and estoppel.

Acceptance of a premium on a policy securing to an employee compensation, either alone or in connection with other insurance, shall estop the carrier so accepting from pleading that the employment of such employee is not covered under this chapter or that the employment is not carried on for pecuniary gain.

When any member of a partnership, firm, or association who does or does not perform manual labor, and where there is coverage of fellow employees, elects to take coverage under the provisions of this chapter, the intent of the insured as well as acceptance by the carrier shall be shown by endorsement to the policy. Any such affirmative action by the parties shall entitle said members or officers to the benefits enjoyed by an employee under this chapter. Every executive officer elected or appointed and empowered in accordance with a charter and bylaws of a corporation, other than nonprofit charitable, fraternal, cultural, or religious corporations or associations, shall be an employee of such corporation under this chapter, provided that said executive officer may reject said coverage by giving notice in writing to the carrier of this election not to be covered as an employee.

Any such executive officer of a nonprofit charitable, fraternal, cultural, or religious corporation or association may, notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, be brought within the coverage of its insurance contract by any such corporation or association by specifically including such executive officer in such contract of insurance. The election to bring such executive officer within the coverage shall continue for the period such contract of insurance is in effect, and during such period such executive officers thus brought within the coverage of the insurance contract shall be employees of such corporation or association under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-40; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 34; Laws, 1950, ch. 412, § 14; Laws, 1964, ch. 444; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 40; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 42, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-81.
Notice of coverage.

Every employer who has secured compensation under the provisions of this chapter shall keep notices posted in a conspicuous place or places in and about his place or places of business, in accordance with a form prescribed by the commission, stating that such employer has secured the payment of compensation in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Such notices shall contain the name and address of the carrier, if any, with whom the employer has secured payment of the compensation and the date of the expiration of the policy.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-41; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 35; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 41; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 43, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

§ 71-3-83.
Civil and criminal penalties for failure to secure payment of compensation.

Any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this chapter who fails to secure such compensation is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. If the employer is a corporation, the president, secretary and treasurer thereof shall be also severally liable to such fine or imprisonment as herein provided for the failure of such corporation to secure the payment of compensation; and such president, secretary and treasurer shall be severally personally liable, jointly with such corporation, for any compensation or other benefit which may accrue under this chapter in respect to any injury which may occur to any employee of such corporation while it shall so fail to secure the payment of compensation as required by this chapter.

Any uninsured employer who knowingly transfers, sells, encumbers, assigns, or in any manner disposes of, conceals, secretes or destroys any property belonging to such employer after one of his employees has been injured within the purview of this chapter, and with intent to avoid the payment of compensation under this chapter to such employee or his dependents, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. If the employer is a corporation, the president, secretary and treasurer thereof shall be also severally liable to such penalty of imprisonment as well as jointly liable with such corporation for such fine.

This section shall not affect any other liability of the employer under this chapter.

In addition to the criminal penalties set forth above, and under the same circumstances, terms and conditions as set forth in subsections (1) and (2), the commission may assess a civil penalty in an amount to be determined by the commission on a case by case basis, but not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). Any civil penalty levied and collected by the commission shall be deposited into the Administrative Expense Fund provided for in Section 71-3-97, and any penalty not voluntarily paid may be collected by civil suit brought by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6998-42; Laws, 1948, ch. 354, § 36; reenacted without change, Laws, 1982, ch. 473, § 42; reenacted without change, Laws, 1990, ch. 405, § 44; Laws, 1993, ch. 552, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 13, 1993).